Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2527YH (6) 91 jm/jh H.F. 436 DIVISION I 1 SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION 2 Section 1. Section 423.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 3 the following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 111. a. The sales price from the sale of a 5 child restraint system used in an automobile. 6 b. For purposes of this subsection: 7 (1) âAutomobileâ means the same as defined in section 321.1. 8 (2) âChild restraint systemâ means the same as defined in 9 section 321.446. 10 DIVISION II 11 INSURANCE SETTLEMENTS 12 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 507B.4D Automobile loss settlements ââ 13 child restraint systems. 14 If an automobile insurance policy provides for the 15 settlement of an automobile partial loss or total loss, a 16 person shall include the value of any child restraint system 17 that is located in an automobile at the time the automobile is 18 subject to a partial loss or a total loss. For purposes of 19 this section, âautomobileâ has the same meaning as defined in 20 section 321.1, and âchild restraint systemâ has the same meaning 21 as defined in section 321.446. 22 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies to 23 automobile losses for automobiles that are subject to a partial 24 loss or a total loss occurring on or after July 1, 2025. 25